Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-247
Board of Barber Examiners; establish rules.

The Board of Barber Examiners shall have the power to establish the necessary rules for carrying out the reciprocal relations with other states or countries which are authorized by sections 71-238 to 71-246.

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 10.